Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4602
Uniformity in construction and use of manufactured homes and recreational vehicles and their systems; purpose.

The Legislature recognizes that uniformity in the manner of the body and frame design, construction, assembly, and use of manufactured homes and recreational vehicles and that of their systems, components, and appliances including their plumbing, heating, and electrical systems is desirable in order that owners may not be burdened with differing requirements and in order to promote construction suitable for the health of the numerous persons living in manufactured homes and recreational vehicles.

Laws 1969, c. 557, § 2, p. 2272;

Laws 1975, LB 300, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 6.